Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.260

Destruction of records by director.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the director may destroy applications for vehicle registrations, copies of vehicle registrations issued, applications for drivers' licenses, copies of issued drivers' licenses, certificates of title and registration or other documents, and records or supporting papers on file in the department that have been microfilmed or photographed or are more than five years old. The director may destroy applications for vehicle registrations that are renewal applications when the computer record of the applications has been updated.

(2)(a) The director shall not destroy records of convictions or adjudications of RCW 46.61.502, 46.61.503, 46.61.504, 46.61.520, and 46.61.522, records of deferred prosecutions granted under RCW 10.05.120, or any other records of a prior offense as defined in RCW 46.61.5055 and shall maintain such records permanently on file.

(b) For purposes of RCW 46.52.101 and 46.52.130, offenses subject to this subsection shall be considered "alcohol-related" offenses.

[ 2016 c 203 s 3; 2015 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 10; 2010 c 161 s 208; 2009 c 276 s 2; 1999 c 86 s 2; 1998 c 207 s 3; 1997 c 66 s 11; 1996 c 199 s 4; 1994 c 275 s 14; 1984 c 241 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 22 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 170 s 45; 1961 c 12 s 46.08.120. Prior: 1955 c 76 s 1; 1951 c 241 s 1; 1937 c 188 s 77; RRS s 6312-77. Formerly RCW 46.08.120.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 2nd sp.s. c 3: See note following RCW 10.21.055.

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.

Effective date—1998 c 207: See note following RCW 46.61.5055.

Severability—1996 c 199: See note following RCW 9.94A.505.

Short title—Effective date—1994 c 275: See notes following RCW 46.04.015.